Illinois, session 104th, HB3043.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Criminal Justice Special Advocates Program for People with 6Disabilities Act. 7    Section 5. Legislative findings and purpose. 8    (a) The General Assembly finds that people with an 9intellectual disability or a developmental disability involved 10in the criminal justice system face unique challenges in 11understanding and navigating all phases of the criminal 12justice process. The General Assembly further finds that it is 13essential that the State of Illinois commence and evaluate a 14pilot program in which special advocates in selected counties 15assist people with intellectual disabilities or developmental 16disabilities while they are involved in the criminal justice 17system through advocacy, education, supports, and referrals to 18appropriate services.19    This pilot program is being established as a direct result 20of recommendations made by the Protection of Individuals with 21Disabilities in the Criminal Justice System Task Force 22convened by the Illinois Guardianship and Advocacy Commission. 23The report of the Task Force issued in September 2021   HB3043- 2 -LRB104 09632 KTG 19697 b1emphasized the need for specialized advocacy services for 2individuals with disabilities who are involved in the criminal 3justice system. 4    (b) The purpose of this Act is to create and evaluate a 55-county pilot program that provides criminal justice advocacy 6services and supports to people with an intellectual 7disability or a developmental disability who are involved in 8the criminal justice system in a participating county. The 9advocates will assist people with an intellectual disability 10or a developmental disability and their guardians, families, 11caregivers, and supported decision-makers to better understand 12each phase of the criminal justice process, ensure that their 13disabilities are understood by officials involved in each 14phase of the process, and ensure that medication is provided 15as prescribed and other unique health needs are met for the 16individual throughout their involvement in the criminal 17justice process. 18    Section 10. Definitions.As used in this Act:19    "Criminal justice special advocate" means a non-attorney 20who is trained to provide support and advocacy services to 21people with an intellectual disability or a developmental 22disability who is involved in the criminal justice system in a 23pilot county. 24    "Department" means the Department of Human Services.25    "Developmental disability" has the same meaning ascribed   HB3043- 3 -LRB104 09632 KTG 19697 b1to it in Section 1-106 of the Mental Health and Developmental 2Disabilities Code.3    "Intellectual disability" has the same meaning ascribed to 4it in Section 1-116 of the Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code. 6    Section 15. Pilot program. Subject to appropriation for 7this purpose, the Department of Human Services shall establish 8a 3-year, 5-county pilot program to provide a minimum of one 9criminal justice special advocate in each selected county to 10serve the advocacy and support needs of an individual with an 11intellectual disability or a developmental disability involved 12in the criminal justice system of the county. Funding shall 13cover the reasonable costs of the pilot county for the 14criminal justice special advocate's salary, benefits, 15training, supervision, equipment and supplies, as approved by 16the Department.  17    Section 20. Selection of counties. The Department shall 18select 5 counties to participate in the 3-year pilot program 19based on an application process established by the Department. 20Criteria for evaluating applications and the selection of 21counties shall be established by the Department. The counties 22selected must be geographically diverse and demonstrate the 23need for a Criminal Justice Special Advocate program. Counties 24shall indicate on their applications where the criminal   HB3043- 4 -LRB104 09632 KTG 19697 b1justice special advocate's office will be located and identify 2the official or officer who will be providing supervision. 3    Section 25. Criminal justice special advocates. 4    (a) Criminal justice special advocates shall be employed 5by the participating county and shall be independent of any 6county official or officer who is directly involved in the 7criminal justice system in the county. 8    (b) Criminal justice special advocates must be 9non-attorneys with some experience and training working with 10people with intellectual disabilities or developmental 11disabilities, preferably with a background in social work, 12counseling, or a related field.13    (c) The primary duties of the criminal justice special 14advocate shall include, but are not limited to:15        (1) Assisting people with an intellectual disability 16    or a developmental disability and their guardians, family 17    members, caregivers, and supported decision-makers in 18    understanding the legal process and their rights within 19    the criminal justice system.20        (2) Advocating for accommodations and necessary 21    services to ensure that people with an intellectual 22    disability or a developmental disability can effectively 23    participate in their defense and the overall legal 24    process.25        (3) Coordinating with prosecutors, defense attorneys,   HB3043- 5 -LRB104 09632 KTG 19697 b1    law enforcement, courts, and service providers to ensure 2    their understanding of the person's disability and 3    facilitate access to appropriate services.4        (4) Providing referrals to mental health, disability 5    services, and other community resources.6        (5) Offering support during court proceedings, 7    interviews, and other phases of the criminal justice 8    process. 9    Section 30. Evaluation and reporting. The Department shall 10evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program by collecting 11annual data as requested by the Department from each 12participating county beginning in 2027 on a date established 13by the Department. The Department shall report to the General 14Assembly and the Governor after the second full year of the 15pilot program has been completed with a recommendation for 16continuation, expansion, or non-continuation of the program 17and detailed reasons for its recommendations.